Idaho, session 2026, H0692.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 16-1613, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
16-1613. HEARINGS UNDER THE CHILD PROTECTIVE ACT THIS CHAPTER. (1)
Proceedings under this chapter shall be dealt with by the court at hearings
separate from those for adults and without a jury. The hearings shall be
conducted in an informal manner and may be adjourned from time to time. The
general public shall be excluded, and only such persons shall be admitted as
are found by the court to have a direct interest in the case. The child may
be excluded from hearings at any time at the discretion of the court. If the
parent or guardian is without counsel, the court shall inform them of their
right to be represented by counsel and to appeal from any disposition or
order of the court.
(2) When a child is summoned as a witness in any hearing under this act
chapter, notwithstanding any other statutory provision, parents, a coun-
selor, a friend, or other person having a supportive relationship with the
child shall, if available, be permitted to remain in the courtroom at the
witness stand with the child during the child's testimony unless, in writ-
ten findings made and entered, the court finds that the constitutional right
of the child's parent(s), guardian(s) or other custodian(s) to a fair hear-
ing will be unduly prejudiced.
(3) At any stage of a proceeding under this chapter, if the court de-
termines that it is in the best interests of the child or society, the court
may cause the proceeding to be expanded or altered to include full or partial
consideration of the cause under the juvenile corrections act chapter 5, ti-
tle 20, Idaho Code, without terminating the original proceeding under this
chapter.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 16, Title 16, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 16-1613A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
16-1613A. ATTENDANCE AT HEARINGS. (1) The court shall state on the
record its reasoning for admitting or excluding non-parties from a hearing.
Admittance to a hearing does not confer party status. Findings by the court


to either admit or exclude a person from a hearing shall not prevent the court
from proceeding with the hearing or issuing any ruling, decision, or order.
(2) Children subject to this chapter have the right to participate in
all proceedings, including the opportunity to personally attend every hear-
ing. The court may waive the presence of a child in hearings if it is unsafe
or inappropriate for the child to be at such hearing.
(3) The department, parents whose rights have not been terminated,
guardians, legal custodians, tribal representatives, assigned guardians
ad litem, the assigned prosecuting attorney or deputy attorney general and
counsel for each of these entities, and any child subject to this chapter
shall be permitted to attend every hearing unless the court finds them dis-
ruptive to the hearing or engaging in improper conduct and makes a written
record of that finding.
(4) There exists a rebuttable presumption that the following persons
shall be admitted to hearings under this chapter:
(a) Any individual identified as a parent, guardian, legal custodian,
or the child or who has knowledge or information relevant to the welfare
and best interests of the child;
(b) Any relative, fictive kin, or other interested persons with whom
the child is or may be placed as described in section 16-1629, Idaho
Code;
(c) Foster parents;
(d) Any persons who have the right to confidential information about
the child necessary for the performance of their duties;
(e) The child's treatment and service providers; and
(f) Staff of the department, a guardian ad litem agency, a prosecuting
attorney's office, the office of the attorney general, or the office of
the state public defender where such persons would attend to supervise
or support assigned staff or in furtherance of staff professional de-
velopment on the processes set forth in this chapter.
(5) There exists a rebuttable presumption that all other persons shall
not be admitted to hearings under this chapter.
(6) In determining the persons to be admitted or excluded from a hear-
ing, the court shall consider the following factors:
(a) The best interests of the child;
(b) The wishes of the child as stated by the child's guardian ad litem or
attorney;
(c) Whether any person's attendance would endanger the child's physi-
cal or emotional well-being or the safety of any other person;
(d) Any agreement between the parties;
(e) Whether the person's attendance would cause specific material harm
to a criminal investigation or prosecution; and
(f) Prior disruptions of court proceedings by a person in any case.
(7) This section shall not be construed to prohibit the exclusion of
witnesses at a hearing where their exclusion is authorized by court rules.
This section shall not be construed to limit which witnesses may be called to
testify at a hearing.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.